District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.58

Transition provisions.

(a)

Persons currently holding appointments to positions in the Career Service who meet the definition of “management employee” as defined in § 1-614.11(5) shall be appointed to the Management Supervisory Service unless the employee declines the appointment. Persons declining appointment shall have priority for appointment to the Career Service if a vacant position for which they qualify is available within the agency and is acceptable to the employee. If no such vacant position is available, a 30-day separation notice shall be issued to the employee, who shall be entitled to severance pay in the manner provided by § 1-624.09.

(b)

A person currently holding an appointment to a position in the Excepted Service pursuant to § 1-609.03(a) who meets the definition of “management employee” as defined in § 1-614.11(5) may, at the discretion of the personnel authority, be appointed noncompetitively to the Management Supervisory Service unless the employee declines the appointment. A person declining appointment shall be entitled to a written 15-day separation notice and shall be paid separation pay in accordance with section § 1-609.03(f).

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 958
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-132, § 2(b), 47 DCR 2694

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-610.58.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-132 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); in subsec. (a) as so designated, in the last sentence, added “, who shall be entitled to severance pay in the manner provided by section 2407”; and added subsec. (b).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Management Supervisory Service Exclusion Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-86, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2837).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Management Supervisory Service Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (the 2nd) (D.C. Act 13-197, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10442).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Management Supervisory Service Exclusion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-283, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2029).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.